arapahoverbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

!POS
[VERB] [NOUN]
!Verb Stem Type
[II] [IA] [TI] [TA]
!Verbal Inflectional Oreder
[AFFIRMATIVE] [NON_AFFIRMATIVE] [IMPERATIVE] [CONJUNCT] [SUBJUNCTIVE] [ITERATIVE] [PROHIBITIVE]
!Person Number of the subject or object, depending on the stem type
[1SG-SUBJ] [2SG-SUBJ] [3SG-SUBJ] [4SG-SUBJ] [1PL-SUBJ] [2PL-SUBJ] [3PL-SUBJ] [4PL-SUBJ] [1PL-EXCL-SUBJ] [1PL-INCL-SUBJ]
[1SG-OBJ] [2SG-OBJ] [3SG-OBJ] [4SG-OBJ] [1PL-OBJ] [2PL-OBJ] [3PL-OBJ] [4PL-OBJ] [1PL-EXCL-OBJ] [1PL-INCL-OBJ]

!markers of polarity
[NEG]
!Tense markings
[PRESENT] [PAST] [FUTURE] [INF]
!markers of aspect
[PROGRESSIVE] [PERFECTIVE] [IMPERFECTIVE] [SIMPLE]
!Initial Change marker: a morphophonological process that occurs in the present tense of verbs in affirmative order
[IC]
!marking mood
[INTERROGATIVE] [INDICATIVE]
!marks a form if it's irregular or old version
[IRREGULAR] [OLD_VERSION]
!interprets the stem type of the verb
[ANIMATE-SUBJECT] [INANIMATE-SUBJECT] [ANIMATE-OBJECT] [INANIMATE-OBJECT]


!Flags section
@U.POS.Verb@ @U.POS.Noun@
@U.StemType.II@ @U.StemType.AI@ @U.StemType.TI@ @U.StemType.TA@
@U.Order.AFF@ @U.Order.NAFF@ @U.Order.IMP@ @U.Order.CONJ@
@U.TENSE.Past@ @U.TENSE.Present@ @U.TENSE.Future@
@U.ASPECT.Perfect@ @U.ASPECT.Prog@ @U.ASPECT.Perfective@ @U.ASPECT.Imperfective@ @U.TAM.Simple@ @U.ASPECT.NotImperfective@
@U.Mood.Question@ @U.Mood.Indicative@
@U.StemInitial.Yes@ @U.StemFinal.Yes@
@U.IC.Yes@
!marks the set of AI verbs with irregular inflection
@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@ @U.ExceptionAI.No@
!marks some verbs that treat their subject and object in the reverse way of normal verbs, e.g. to like someone
@U.Backward.Yes@ @U.Backward.No@
! marking person-number inflections, as they are circumfixes and we want to suffix the correct expected form to the correct prefixed stem.
@U.PERNUM.1SGS@ @U.PERNUM.1PLS@ @U.PERNUM.12S@ @U.PERNUM.2SGS@ @U.PERNUM.2PLS@ @U.PERNUM.3SGS@ @U.PERNUM.3PLS@ @U.PERNUM.4SGS@ @U.PERNUM.4PLS@
@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@ @U.PERNUM.12SAI@ @U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@ @U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@ @U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@
@U.PERNUM.1SGTI@ @U.PERNUM.1PLTI@ @U.PERNUM.12TI@ @U.PERNUM.2SGTI@ @U.PERNUM.2PLTI@ @U.PERNUM.3SGTI@ @U.PERNUM.3PLTI@ @U.PERNUM.4SGTI@ @U.PERNUM.4PLTI@
@U.PERNUM.1S2S@ @U.PERNUM.1S2PL@ @U.PERNUM.2S1S@ @U.PERNUM.2PL1S@ @U.PERNUM.1PL2S@ @U.PERNUM.1PL2PL@ @U.PERNUM.2S1PL@ @U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@ @U.PERNUM.1S3S@ @U.PERNUM.1S3PL@ @U.PERNUM.2S3S@ @U.PERNUM.2S3PL@ @U.PERNUM.3S4S@ @U.PERNUM.3S4PL@ @U.PERNUM.4S4S@ @U.PERNUM.4S4PL@ @U.PERNUM.1PL3S@ @U.PERNUM.1PL3PL@ @U.PERNUM.123S@ @U.PERNUM.123PL@ @U.PERNUM.2PL3S@ @U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@ @U.PERNUM.3PL4S@ @U.PERNUM.3PL4PL@ @U.PERNUM.4PL4S@ @U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@ @U.PERNUM.3S1S@ @U.PERNUM.3PL1S@ @U.PERNUM.3S2S@ @U.PERNUM.3PL2S@ @U.PERNUM.4S3S@ @U.PERNUM.4PL3S@ @U.PERNUM.4S4S@ @U.PERNUM.4S4PL@ @U.PERNUM.3S1PL@ @U.PERNUM.3PL1PL@ @U.PERNUM.3S12@ @U.PERNUM.3PL12@ @U.PERNUM.3S2PL@ @U.PERNUM.3PL2PL@ @U.PERNUM.4S3PL@ @U.PERNUM.4PL3PL@

@U.Polarity.Negative@ @U.Polarity.Positive@
@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@ @U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@
@U.PVHBlock.Yes@

@U.yootiStem.Yes@ @U.RegularII.Yes@ @U.RegularII.No@

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Main Lexicon !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
@U.POS.Verb@[VERB]:@U.POS.Verb@		StemInit;
!@U.POS.Noun@[NOUN]:@U.POS.Noun@		StemInit;

LEXICON StemInit
@U.StemType.II@[II][INANIMATE-SUBJECT]:@U.StemType.II@		Ordering;
@U.StemType.AI@[AI][ANIMATE-SUBJECT]:@U.StemType.AI@		Ordering;
@U.StemType.TI@[TI][INANIMATE-OBJECT]:@U.StemType.TI@		Ordering;
@U.StemType.TA@[TA][ANIMATE-OBJECT]:@U.StemType.TA@		Ordering;

LEXICON Ordering
@U.Order.AFF@[AFFIRMATIVE]:@U.Order.AFF@		AffOrder;
@U.Order.NAFF@[NON_AFFIRMATIVE]:@U.Order.NAFF@		Question;
@U.Order.IMP@		ImpOrder;

LEXICON AffOrder
@U.Mood.Indicative@		Tense;

LEXICON Question
@U.Polarity.Positive@@U.Mood.Question@[INTERROGATIVE]:@U.Polarity.Positive@@U.Mood.Question@^kOO^      NaffOrder;
@U.Polarity.Negative@                                        NaffOrder;

LEXICON NaffOrder
@U.StemType.II@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.12SAI@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.12SAI@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.1SGTI@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.1SGTI@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.1PLTI@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.1PLTI@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.12TI@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.12TI@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.2SGTI@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.2SGTI@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.2PLTI@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.2PLTI@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.3SGTI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.3PLTI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.4SGTI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.PERNUM.4PLTI@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S2S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S2S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S2PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S2PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S1S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S1S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL1S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL1S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL2S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL2S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL2PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL2PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S1PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S1PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S3S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S3S@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S3PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1S3PL@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S3S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S3S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S3PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2S3PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S4S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S4PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S4S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL3S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL3S@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL3PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.1PL3PL@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.123S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.123S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.123PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.123PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL3S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL3S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL4S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL4PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4PL4S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S1S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S1S@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL1S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL1S@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S2S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S2S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL2S@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL2S@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S3S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4PL3S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S4S@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S1PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S1PL@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL1PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL1PL@^ne^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S12@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S12@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL12@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL12@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S2PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3S2PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL2PL@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.3PL2PL@^e^		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S3PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4PL3PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@		NaffOrder2;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@		NaffOrder2;


LEXICON NaffOrder2
@U.StemType.II@@U.Polarity.Negative@[NEG]:@U.StemType.II@@U.Polarity.Negative@^ihoow^		Tense;
@U.StemType.II@@U.Polarity.Positive@@U.Mood.Question@		Tense;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.Polarity.Negative@[NEG]:@U.StemType.AI@@U.Polarity.Negative@^ihoow^		Tense;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.Polarity.Positive@@U.Mood.Question@		Tense;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.Polarity.Negative@[NEG]:@U.StemType.TA@@U.Polarity.Negative@^ihoow^		Tense;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.Polarity.Positive@@U.Mood.Question@		Tense;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.Polarity.Negative@[NEG]:@U.StemType.TI@@U.Polarity.Negative@^ihoowu^		Tense;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.Polarity.Positive@@U.Mood.Question@		Tense;


LEXICON ImpOrder
@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@[IMPERATIVE]:@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@		Stem;
@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@		Prohibitive;


LEXICON Tense
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TENSE.Present@[PRESENT]@U.IC.Yes@[IC]:@U.Order.AFF@@U.TENSE.Present@@U.IC.Yes@		Stem ;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TENSE.Present@[PRESENT]:@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TENSE.Present@		Stem;
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TENSE.Past@[PAST]:@U.Order.AFF@@U.TENSE.Past@^ih^		Stem;


LEXICON Prohibitive
@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@[PROHIBITIVE]:@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@^ciibeh^		Stem;
